Utah statutes.
31A-25-301.   Written agreements required.
(1)  Every third party administrator shall have a written agreement with each
insurer and with each group policyholder represented.
(2)  The agreements required by Subsection (1) shall contain provisions which
include the requirements of this part, except where those requirements are not
applicable to the particular functions carried out by the third party
administrator.
(3)  If a policy is issued to a trustee, a copy of the trust agreement and its
amendments shall be furnished to the third party administrator and kept on
file in the offices of the third party administrator.
